Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1481.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 44 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 75CIVILIAN COMMUNITY RELATIONS SPECIALISTSSec.7501. Scope of chapter.7502. Definitions.7503. Duties of commission.7504. Fund.§ 7501. Scope of chapter.This chapter relates to civilian community relations specialists.12345678910111213141516171819 § 7502. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Civilian community relations specialist." An individual who works with a law enforcement agency and whose duties include, without limitation, developing and implementing programs in the community to prevent crime, build public trust, promote community-oriented policing, advocate on behalf of victims and engage in public awareness on a variety of topics of interest to the community."Commission." The Pennsylvania Commission on Crime and Delinquency."Fund." The Civilian Community Relations Specialists Fund established in section 7504(a) (relating to fund)."Law enforcement agency." A police department of a municipality."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town or township of this Commonwealth.§ 7503. Duties of commission.The commission shall, in consultation with the Pennsylvania State Police:(1) Develop and administer programs for civilian community relations specialists to assist law enforcement agencies.(2) Coordinate resources with law enforcement agencies to create and maintain positions for civilian community relations specialists.(3) Assess the proper operation of civilian community relations specialists across this Commonwealth and their role 20250HB1481PN2272 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with law enforcement agencies.(4) Adopt or promulgate any necessary rules or regulations to implement and administer this chapter.§ 7504. Fund.The Civilian Community Relations Specialists Fund is established in the State Treasury. The money in the fund is appropriated on a continuing basis to the commission for the purposes of this chapter. Interest earned by the fund shall be paid into the fund.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1481PN2272 - 3 - 12345678910